Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.141

License—Duration—Posting.

An escrow agent's license shall remain in effect until surrendered, revoked, suspended, or until it expires, and shall at all times be kept conspicuously posted in all places of business of the agent.

[ 1999 c 30 s 12; 1965 c 153 s 10. Formerly RCW 18.44.100.]